Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-707
County conventions; time; place; notice; delegates; selection.

(1) A political party may conduct county conventions at an hour and place to be designated by a political party. The political party shall cause to be published, at least seven days prior to the date of the county convention, an official notice of the date, time, and place of the convention.

(2) If there is not a full quota of delegates for the county convention as established by the political party, the delegates at the county convention may select delegates to fill the quota from the registered voters affiliated with the political party in the county.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 207;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 69;

Laws 2009, LB133, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB1048, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 57.